Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 4. General Assembly.

§ 24.2-214.
Election and term of Senators.

The members of the Senate of Virginia shall be elected at the general election in November 1995, and every four years thereafter for terms of four years, to begin on the second Wednesday in January succeeding their election.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-13; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-13; 1993, c. 641.

Cross references.

For constitutional provision as to election of senators, see Va. Const., Art. IV, § 2.

§ 24.2-215.
Election and term of members of the House of Delegates.

The members of the House of Delegates shall be elected at the general election in November 1995, and every two years thereafter for terms of two years, to begin on the second Wednesday in January succeeding their election.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-11; 1958, c. 333; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-11; 1993, c. 641.

Cross references.

For constitutional provision as to election of delegates, see Va. Const., Art. IV, § 3.

§ 24.2-216.
Filling vacancies in the General Assembly.

When a vacancy occurs in the membership of the General Assembly during the recess of the General Assembly or when a member-elect to the next General Assembly dies, resigns, or becomes legally incapacitated to hold office prior to its meeting, the Governor shall issue a writ of election to fill the vacancy. If the vacancy occurs during the session of the General Assembly, the Speaker of the House of Delegates or the President pro tempore of the Senate, as the case may be, shall issue the writ unless the respective house by rule or resolution shall provide otherwise. Upon receipt of written notification by a member or member-elect of his resignation as of a stated date, the Governor, Speaker, or President Pro Tempore, as the case may be, may immediately issue the writ to call the election. The member’s or member-elect’s resignation shall not be revocable after the date stated by him for his resignation or after the forty-fifth day before the date set for the special election.

The writ shall be directed to the secretaries of the electoral boards and the general registrars of the respective counties and cities composing the district for which the election is to be held.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no election to fill a vacancy shall be ordered or held if the general or special election at which it is to be called is scheduled within 75 days of the end of the term of the office to be filled.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-16; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-16; 1983, c. 461; 1993, c. 641; 2003, c. 1015; 2010, cc. 449, 645; 2016, cc. 18, 492.

Cross references.

For constitutional provisions as to writs of election to fill vacancies, see Va. Const., Art. IV, § 7.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, added the last sentence in the first paragraph, and added the last paragraph.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 449 and 645 are identical, and substituted “forty-fifth day” for “thirtieth day” in the first paragraph.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 18 and 492 are identical, and inserted “and the general registrars” in the second paragraph.